California statutes. Education Code
(a) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the department shall use the funding appropriated in Item 6100-488 of the Budget Act of 2026 to support the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy established pursuant to Section 44690 to support statewide professional learning opportunities, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Professional learning, including training and coaching to support principals, teacher leaders, and other school leaders in critical areas, as determined by the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence.

(2) Professional learning, including training and coaching for educators pursuing a preliminary
 administrative services credential or a clear administrative services credential in a program approved by the commission and educators with a valid certificate of eligibility.

(3) Continuing or expanding professional learning funded pursuant to Section 142 of Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021.

(b) The funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2031.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 77.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.2. Staff Development in the Detection of Child Abuse and Neglect [44691. - 44691.]

44691.

(a) The State Department of Education, in consultation with the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Department of Social Services, shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop and disseminate information to all school districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, and charter schools, and their school personnel in California, regarding the detection and reporting of child abuse, and post on the department’s internet website links to existing training resources.

(2) Provide statewide guidance on the responsibilities of mandated reporters who are school personnel in accordance with the Child Abuse and Neglect
 Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code). This guidance shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, both of the following:

(A) Information on the identification of child abuse and neglect.

(B) Reporting requirements for child abuse and neglect.

(b) (1) The State Department of Education shall develop and disseminate information to all school districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, and charter schools, and their school personnel in California, regarding the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse, of children on school grounds, by school personnel, or in school-sponsored programs.

(2) The State Department of Education shall develop appropriate means of instructing school personnel regarding the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse, of children on school grounds, by school personnel, or in school-sponsored programs.

(c) School districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, and charter schools shall do the following:

(1) (A) Provide annual training, using the online training module provided by the State Department of Social Services or as provided in subdivision (d), to their employees and persons working on their behalf who are mandated reporters, as defined in Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code, pursuant to this section and subdivision (d) of Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code on the
 mandated reporting requirements. This training shall include information that failure to report an incident of known or reasonably suspected child abuse or neglect, as required by Section 11166 of the Penal Code, is a misdemeanor punishable by up to six months confinement in a county jail, or by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(B) Provide annual training on the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse, of children on school grounds, by school personnel, or in school-sponsored programs.

(C) The training provided pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall be provided to school personnel hired during the course of the school year.

(D) It is the intent of the Legislature that the child abuse prevention content, as added by Assembly Bill 1913 of the 2023–24 Regular
 Session, will not add to the duration of training requirements pursuant to this section, as it read on January 1, 2024, but instead only alter the content of those training requirements.

(2) Develop a process for all persons required to receive training pursuant to this section to provide proof of completing the training within the first six weeks of each school year or within the first six weeks of that person’s employment. The process developed under this paragraph may include, but not necessarily be limited to, the use of a sign-in sheet or the submission of a certificate of completion to the applicable governing board or body of the school district, county office of education, state special school and diagnostic center, or charter school.

(d) School districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of
 Education, and charter schools that do not use the online training module provided by the State Department of Social Services shall report to the State Department of Education the training being used in its place.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 814, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 9.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 10 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 460.)
-------------------------------------------

44691.

(a) The State Department of Education, in consultation with the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Department of Social Services, shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop and disseminate information to all school districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, private schools, and charter schools, and their school personnel and volunteers in California, regarding the detection and reporting of child abuse and assault, and post on the department’s internet website links to existing training resources.

(2) Provide statewide guidance on the responsibilities of mandated reporters who are
 school personnel in accordance with the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code). This guidance shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(A) Information on the identification of child abuse and neglect and child sexual abuse and assault.

(B) Reporting requirements for child abuse and neglect and child sexual abuse and assault.

(b) (1) The State Department of Education shall develop and disseminate information to all school districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, private schools, and charter schools, and their school personnel and volunteers in California, regarding the prevention of abuse, including sexual
 abuse and assault, of children on school grounds, by school personnel and volunteers, or in school-sponsored programs.

(2) The State Department of Education shall develop appropriate means of instructing school personnel regarding the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse, of children on school grounds, by school personnel, or in school-sponsored programs.

(c) School districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, private schools, and charter schools shall do the following:

(1) (A) Provide annual training, using the online training module provided by the State Department of Social Services or as provided in subdivision (d), to their employees, volunteers, and persons working on their behalf who are mandated
 reporters, as defined in Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code, pursuant to this section and subdivision (d) of Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code on the mandated reporting requirements. This training shall include information that failure to report an incident of known or reasonably suspected child abuse or neglect, as required by Section 11166 of the Penal Code, is a misdemeanor punishable by up to six months confinement in a county jail, or by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(B) Provide annual training on the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, of children on school grounds, by school personnel and volunteers, or in school-sponsored programs.

(C) The training provided pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall be provided to school personnel hired during the course of the school year and to volunteers upon
 commencing volunteer services.

(D) It is the intent of the Legislature that the child abuse prevention content, as added by Assembly Bill 1913 of the 2023–24 Regular Session, will not add to the duration of training requirements pursuant to this section, as it read on January 1, 2024, but instead only alter the content of those training requirements.

(2) Develop a process for all persons required to receive training pursuant to this section to provide proof of completing the training within the first six weeks of each school year, within the first six weeks of that person’s employment, or within six weeks of commencing volunteer services. The process developed under this paragraph may include, but not be limited to, the use of a sign-in sheet or the submission of a certificate of completion to the applicable governing board or body of the school district, county office of
 education, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education, private school, or charter school.

(d) (1) School districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, private schools, and charter schools that do not use the online training module provided by the State Department of Social Services shall use an equivalent training module developed specifically to meet the requirements of this section and report that training to the State Department of Education.

(2) The alternative training module shall be approved by the public entity risk pool joint powers authority or liability insurance provider used by the school district, county office of education, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education,
 private school, or charter school.

(e) For purposes of this section, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.

(f) A person who has completed the mandated reporter training provided by the State Department of Social Services and received a certificate of completion within the previous 12 months shall be deemed to satisfy the training requirements specified in this section.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the child sexual abuse and assault content, as added by Senate Bill 848 of the 2025–26 Regular Session, will not add to the duration of training requirements pursuant to this section, as it read on January 1, 2025, but instead only alter the content of those
 training requirements.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 10.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.4. Teacher Recruitment Resource Center [44750. - 44750.]

44750.

The Commission on Teacher Credentialing, with the assistance of the State Department of Education, shall establish and operate a resource center that shall collect and maintain information regarding state and federal programs that encourage or assist military personnel, upon retirement, to enter the teaching profession. That information shall be applied to improve the effectiveness of the commission and the department in administering teacher recruitment programs, and in responding to inquiries from local educational agencies and others. In addition, that information shall be applied to improve the ability of the commission and the department to provide assistance to military personnel, to the extent resources are available for this purpose, that includes advice regarding courses, and alternatives to traditional teacher training programs, that result in qualification for a teaching credential.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1142, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Note: Sections 44740 and 44741 are in Chapter 3.8, which follows Section 44787.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.6. Regional Science Resource Centers [44770. - 44774.]

44770.

In enacting this chapter, it is the intent of the Legislature to create and expand regional science resource centers to increase educational and training opportunities for the teachers and students of California. Towards that end, the Legislature intends to provide ongoing funding to support regional science resource centers, in partnership with nonprofit agencies which have demonstrated success in attaining private and governmental support for similar activities on a regional level.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1651, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

44771.

The Superintendent shall designate nonprofit agencies to serve as regional science resource centers. In order to be eligible to be designated as a regional science resource center, a nonprofit agency shall demonstrate all of the following:

(a) A history of doing all of the following on a regional basis:

(1) Developing and operating a large variety of high quality science exhibits. 

(2) Providing teacher training.

(3) Providing educational services for elementary and secondary school pupils. 

(b) That its current efforts would be improved both qualitatively and quantitatively, and that a greater number of teachers and students would be served.

(c) Historic success in attracting private and public financial support for development and use of its science exhibits and for its teacher training programs. 

(d) That its exhibits would be cross-referenced to appropriate instructional materials and strategies used by public school teachers providing science and mathematics instruction.

(e) The ability to train a minimum of 200 teachers each year in all grade levels.

(f) That local school districts have agreed to cooperate in the teacher training program by providing payment for a portion of the costs of release time for teacher training.

(g) A commitment to comply with all state and local regulations in establishing priorities and implementing this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1651, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

44772.

From funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter, the superintendent shall allocate funds to applicant regional science resource centers. The superintendent shall review each center’s application for funding to ensure that the funds will be used only for the purposes authorized by Section 44773, and that the objectives of this chapter will be carried out.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1651, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

44773.

Funds allocated to regional science resource centers pursuant to Section 44772 shall be used by the centers only for the following purposes:

(a) Expansion of science exhibits.

(b) Costs of institute staff training.

(c) Payment of a portion of the costs incurred by school districts using the center’s services to train and retrain teachers.

(d) Expansion of teacher training services and educational services to students at exhibit sites and schools.

(e) Administration and evaluation of project funds.

(f) Classroom materials and supplies relating to science education developed by the center.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1651, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

44774.

Funds allocated to a regional science resource center pursuant to this chapter shall supplement, and shall not supplant, funding for the continuing efforts of these centers to provide teacher training or educational services to public schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1651, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.65. Social Tolerance Resource Centers [44776.1. - 44776.7.]

44776.1.

In enacting this chapter, it is the intent of the Legislature to expand regional social tolerance resource centers to increase education and training opportunities for the teachers and pupils of California. Towards that end, the Legislature intends to provide one-time funding to support regional social tolerance resource centers, in partnership with nonprofit agencies that have demonstrated success in attaining private and governmental support for similar activities on a regional basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 15.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44776.2.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall designate nonprofit agencies to serve as regional social tolerance resource centers. In order to be eligible to be designated as a regional social tolerance resource center, a nonprofit agency shall demonstrate all of the following:

(a) A history of doing all of the following on a regional basis:

(1) Developing and operating a variety of high-quality interactive and multimedia exhibits on social tolerance, the Holocaust, and human rights.

(2) Providing teacher training activities and curricular materials.

(3) Providing educational services for elementary and secondary school pupils, with a special focus on pupils at risk of social violence.

(b) That the agency’s current efforts would be improved qualitatively and quantitatively.

(c) Historic success in attracting private and public financial support for the development and use of its social tolerance exhibits and for its teacher training programs.

(d) That its exhibits would be cross-referenced to appropriate instructional materials and strategies used by public school teachers providing instruction in social tolerance.

(e) The ability to serve a minimum of 500 teachers each year in all grade levels.

(f) The ability to serve a minimum of 70,000 elementary and secondary pupils each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 15.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44776.3.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate the funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter to applicant regional social tolerance resource centers. The superintendent shall review each center’s application for funding to ensure that the funds will be used only for the purposes authorized in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 15.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44776.4.

Funds allocated to regional social tolerance resource centers pursuant to Section 44776.3 shall be used by the centers only for either of the following purposes:

(a) One-time expansion of social tolerance exhibits and teacher training materials.

(b) One-time expenditures to reduce future ongoing facilities operations costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 15.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44776.5.

Funds allocated to a regional social tolerance resource center pursuant to this chapter shall supplement and not supplant funding for the continuing efforts of these centers to provide teacher training or educational services to public schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 15.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44776.6.

For the 1995–96 fiscal year, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall designate one regional social tolerance resource center to receive funding pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 15.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44776.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, “moneys to be applied by the state,” as used in subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, includes funds appropriated for social tolerance resource centers pursuant to this chapter, whether or not those funds are allocated to school districts, as defined in Section 41302.5, or community college districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 15.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.66. Latino Heritage Resource Centers [44777.1. - 44777.7.]

44777.1.

In enacting this chapter, it is the intent of the Legislature to foster the establishment of regional Latino heritage resource centers to increase educational opportunities for the teachers and pupils of California. Towards that end, the Legislature intends to provide one-time funding to help establish regional Latino heritage resource centers, in partnership with nonprofit agencies which have demonstrated success in attaining private and governmental support for this purpose on a regional basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 16.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44777.2.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall designate nonprofit agencies to serve as regional Latino heritage resource centers. In order to be eligible to be designated as a regional Latino heritage resource center, a nonprofit agency shall demonstrate all of the following:

(a) A sound programmatic and fiscal plan to do all of the following on a regional basis:

(1) Develop a variety of high-quality permanent and changing exhibits on Latino history, art, and culture encompassing North, Central, and South America.

(2) Provide teacher training activities.

(3) Provide educational services for elementary and secondary school pupils.

(b) Success in attracting private and public financial support for the development of its Latino heritage exhibits and educational programs.

(c) That it will be providing educational services previously unavailable to pupils and teachers in the region including the development of a referral assistance program for teachers on Latino heritage issues, and the development of publications and audio-visual materials on Latino history, art, and culture.

(d) That its current efforts would be improved qualitatively and quantitatively.

(e) That it will collect and preserve Latino cultural heritage and artifacts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 16.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44777.3.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate the funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter to applicant regional Latino heritage resource centers. The superintendent shall review each center’s application for funding to ensure that the funds will be used only for the purposes authorized in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 16.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44777.4.

Funds allocated to regional Latino heritage resource centers pursuant to Section 44777.3 shall be used by the centers only for initial development costs of exhibits, collections, and teacher training materials in Latino heritage, encompassing history, art, and culture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 16.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44777.5.

Funds allocated to a regional Latino heritage resource center pursuant to this chapter shall supplement and not supplant funding for the efforts of these centers to develop collections and to provide teacher training or educational services to public schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 16.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44777.6.

For the 1995–96 fiscal year, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall designate one regional Latino heritage resource center to receive funding pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 16.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44777.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, “moneys to be applied by the state,” as used in subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, includes funds appropriated for Latino heritage resource centers pursuant to this chapter, whether or not those funds are allocated to school districts, as defined in Section 41302.5, or community college districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 308, Sec. 16.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Employment—Certificated Employees [44800. - 45061.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Rights and Duties [44800. - 44824.]

44800.

Every person employed by a school district as a probationary or permanent employee in a position requiring certification qualifications who enters the active military service of the United States of America or of the State of California, including active service in any uniformed auxiliary of, or to, any branch of such military service, created or authorized as such auxiliary by the Congress of the United States of America or by the Legislature of the State of California, or in the service of the United States Merchant Marine, or in full-time paid service of the American Red Cross, during any period of national emergency declared by the President of the United States of America or during any war in which the United States of America is engaged, shall be entitled to absent himself from his duties as an employee of the district.

Such absence shall not affect in any way the classification of such employee. In the case of a probationary employee, the period of such absence shall not count as part of the service required as a condition precedent to the classification of such employee as a permanent employee of the district, but such absence shall not be construed as a break in the continuity of the service of such employee for any purpose.

The dismissal or termination of any probationary employee because of reduced attendance due to war conditions, after his entry into the active military service or service in the American Red Cross, shall not deprive him of any of the benefits of this section.

Within six months after such employee honorably leaves such service or has been placed on inactive duty he shall, subject to the provisions of this section, be entitled to return to the position held by him at the time of his entrance into such service, at the salary to which he would have been entitled had he not absented himself from the service of the school district under this section.

If such employee was employed under a lawful contract for a period in excess of one year in a position in which he had not become a permanent employee of the district, he shall be entitled to return to such position for the period his contract of employment had to run at the time he entered such service. Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, a person employed to take the place of any such employee shall not have any right to such position following the return of such employee to the position.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44801.

Every person employed by a school district as a permanent employee in a position requiring certification qualifications who is elected to the Legislature shall be granted a leave of absence from his duties as an employee of the district by the governing board of the district.

During the term of such leave of absence, the employee may be employed by the school district to perform such less than full-time service requiring certification qualifications, for such compensation and upon such terms and conditions, as may be mutually agreed upon.

Such absence shall not affect in any way the classification of such employee. 

Within six months after the term of office of such employee expires he shall be entitled to return to the position held by him at the time of his election, at the salary to which he would have been entitled had he not absented himself from the service of the school district under this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, a person employed to take the place of any such employee shall not have any right to such position following the return of such employee to the position.

This section shall apply to any permanent certificated school district employee who held the office of Member of the Assembly or State Senator on or after January 4, 1965.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44802.

The governing board of any school district may provide for the payment of the actual and necessary traveling expenses of student teachers of vocational agriculture who hold certificates issued pursuant to Section 44292 when performing the duties of their positions.

All payments heretofore made to student teachers of vocational agriculture on account of actual and necessary traveling expenses incurred by them when performing the duties of their respective positions are hereby confirmed, ratified, and validated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44803.

Every probationary employee of a school district which becomes in its entirety a part of a unified school district and every probationary employee of a school district employed in a school located in a portion of a school district which becomes a part of a unified school district, where the whole of the district does not become a part of a unified school district, shall become a probationary employee of the unified school district. The service of the probationary employee in the annexed district shall be considered as service in the unified school district for the purpose of any law relating to the classification of persons employed in school districts in positions requiring certification qualifications.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44805.

Every teacher in the public schools shall enforce the course of study, the use of legally authorized textbooks, and the rules and regulations prescribed for schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44806.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Institution of higher education” has the same meaning as used in Section 44203.

(b) “Regionally accredited” has the same meaning as used in Section 44203.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 30.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44807.

Every teacher in the public schools shall hold pupils to a strict account for their conduct on the way to and from school, on the playgrounds, or during recess. A teacher, vice principal, principal, or any other certificated employee of a school district, shall not be subject to criminal prosecution or criminal penalties for the exercise, during the performance of his duties, of the same degree of physical control over a pupil that a parent would be legally privileged to exercise but which in no event shall exceed the amount of physical control reasonably necessary to maintain order, protect property, or protect the health and safety of pupils, or to maintain proper and appropriate conditions conducive to learning. The provisions of this section are in addition to and do not supersede the provisions of Section 49000.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44808.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, no school district, city or county board of education, county superintendent of schools, or any officer or employee of such district or board shall be responsible or in any way liable for the conduct or safety of any pupil of the public schools at any time when such pupil is not on school property, unless such district, board, or person has undertaken to provide transportation for such pupil to and from the school premises, has undertaken a school-sponsored activity off the premises of such school, has otherwise specifically assumed such responsibility or liability or has failed to exercise reasonable care under the circumstances.

In the event of such a specific undertaking, the district, board, or person shall be liable or responsible for the conduct or safety of any pupil only while such pupil is or should be under the immediate and direct supervision of an employee of such district or board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44808.5.

The governing board of a school district may permit the pupils enrolled at any high school to leave the school grounds during the lunch period of such pupils.

Neither the school district nor any officer or employee thereof shall be liable for the conduct or safety of any pupil during such time as the pupil has left the school grounds pursuant to this section.

In the event that the governing board grants such permission, it shall send the following notice along with the notification of parents and guardians required by Section 48980:

“The governing board of the ____ School District, pursuant to Section 44808.5 of the Education Code, has decided to permit the pupils enrolled at ____ High School to leave the school grounds during the lunch period.

“Section 44808.5 of the Education Code further states:

“‛Neither the school district nor any officer or employee thereof shall be liable for the conduct or safety of any pupil during such time as the pupil has left the school grounds pursuant to this section.”’

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44809.

(a) A state school register shall be kept by every teacher in the public elementary schools, except a teacher in:

(1) A school in which the state school register of each teacher is kept on behalf of the teacher in a central office by an employee of the school district.

(2) A school in which a central file of individual records of pupil enrollment, absence, and attendance is maintained on forms containing at least the minimum items of information prescribed by the State Department of Education, and whose principal submits periodic reports of pupil personnel data to the city or district superintendent of schools, or, if no superintendent is employed in the district, to the county superintendent of schools on forms approved by the State Department of Education.

(b) There shall be recorded in each state school register the absence and attendance of each pupil enrolled in the classes taught by the teacher keeping the register or on whose behalf the register is kept and any additional information required by the State Department of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44810.

(a) Every minor over 16 years of age or adult who is not a pupil of the school, including but not limited to any such minor or adult who is the parent or guardian of a pupil of the school, who comes upon any school ground or into any schoolhouse and there willfully interferes with the discipline, good order, lawful conduct, or administration of any school class or activity of the school, with the intent to disrupt, obstruct, or to inflict damage to property or bodily injury upon any person, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) A violation of subdivision (a) shall be punished as follows:

(1) Upon the first conviction, by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(2) Upon a second conviction, by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not less than 10 days, and not more than one year, or by both imprisonment and a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000). The defendant shall not be released on probation, or for any other basis until he or she has served not less than 10 days in a county jail.

(3) Upon a third or subsequent conviction, by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not less than 90 days, and not more than one year, or by both imprisonment and a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000). The defendant shall not be released on probation, or for any other basis until he or she has served not less than 90 days in a county jail.

(4) Upon a showing of good cause, the court may find that for any mandatory minimum imprisonment specified by paragraph (2) or (3) of this subdivision, the imprisonment shall not be imposed, and the court may grant probation, or the suspension of the execution or imposition of the sentence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1013, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

44811.

(a) Any parent, guardian, or other person whose conduct in a place where a school employee is required to be in the course of his or her duties materially disrupts classwork or extracurricular activities or involves substantial disorder is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) A violation of subdivision (a) shall be punished as follows:

(1) Upon the first conviction, by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(2) Upon a second conviction, by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not less than 10 days, and not more than one year, or by both imprisonment and a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000). The defendant shall not be released on probation, or for any other basis until he or she has served not less than 10 days in a county jail.

(3) Upon a third or subsequent conviction, by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not less than 90 days, and not more than one year, or by both imprisonment and a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000). The defendant shall not be released on probation, or for any other basis until he or she has served not less than 90 days in a county jail.

(4) Upon a showing of good cause, the court may find that for any mandatory minimum imprisonment specified by paragraph (2) or (3) of this subdivision, the imprisonment shall not be imposed, and the court may grant probation, or the suspension of the execution or imposition of the sentence.

(c) This section shall not apply to any otherwise lawful employee concerted activity, including, but not limited to, picketing and the distribution of handbills.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1013, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

44813.
